


Enphase Energy - Wikipedia





















 






Enphase Energy

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (August 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Enphase Energy, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: ENPH


Industry
Renewable Energy, Solar Energy, High tech


Founded
2006


Founder
Raghu Belur and Martin Fornage


Headquarters
Petaluma, California, United States



Key people

Paul Nahi, CEO


Products
microinverters, home energy storage


Revenue
 US$343.9 million (2014)



Operating income

 US$5.9 million (2014)



Net income

 US$2.7 million (2014)



Number of employees

500+


Website
Enphase.com



Footnotes / references
Financials from Enphase Energy
[1]


Enphase Energy is a NASDAQ-listed energy technology company headquartered in Petaluma, California. Enphase designs and manufactures software-driven home energy solutions that span solar generation, home energy storage and web-based monitoring and control. Enphase has shipped about ten million solar microinverters, primarily into the residential and commercial markets in North America, Europe and Australia. Microinverters convert the direct current power from the solar panel (DC) directly into grid-compatible alternating current (AC) for use or export. Enphase was the first company to successfully commercialise the microinverter on a wide scale, and remains the market leader.[2]



Contents


1 History
2 Products

2.1 Legacy Products
2.2 Current Products


3 References
4 External links



History[edit]
A number of companies and institutes had promoted the solar micro-inverter concept through the 1990s. The basic idea is to reduce the power handling of a conventional inverter design so that it matches the output of a single panel. This so reduces the size of the inverter that it can be placed on the back of the panel, producing an "AC panel". Such a system can be connected directly to the grid, or to each other to produce larger arrays. This contrasts with the traditional solar inverter approach where many panels are connected together in series on the DC-side and then run en-masse to a single larger inverter. Several products based on the micro-inverter concept were introduced in the 1990s and especially the early 2000s, but none were widely successful due to a number of factors.
In the aftermath of the 2001 Telecoms crash, Martin Fornage of Cerent Corporation was looking for new projects. When he saw the low performance of the string inverter for the solar array on his ranch, he formed Enphase Energy with another Cerent engineer, Raghu Belur, in 2006. Backed by $100 million in private equity, in 2008 they released their first product, the M175, to moderate success. Their 2nd generation product, 2009's M190, was far more successful, with sales of about 400,000 units in 2009 and early 2010. Enphase quickly grew to 13% marketshare for residential systems by mid-2010, aiming for 20% by year-end.[3]
They shipped their 500,000th inverter in early 2011,[4] and their 1,000,000th in September of the same year.[5] The 3rd generation M215 was released in the summer of 2011,[6] and had sold over a million of all models in 2011, bringing their installed base to 1.55 million inverters and 34.4% market share.[7] A 4th generation, the M250, was released in 2013.
As of 2012[update], their inverters captured 53.5% market share for residential installations in the US, which represents 72% of the entire world micro-inverter market.[8] This makes them the sixth largest inverter manufacturer, of any kind, worldwide.[9] Enphase has experimented with the European market starting in France and offering sales in France, Belgium, the Netherlands, Luxembourg and Italy.[10] However, they had considerably more success in the UK, and later, Australia. As of 2013[update], approximately 20% of their sales is outside North America.[11]
Enphase continues to see increasing pricing pressure due to rapidly falling prices in the inverter market. In spite of several effects that should cause stability, prices for inverters are predicted to fall 11% during 2013. Market leaders, especially, face continued market share erosion in the face of newer companies, most of them from the far east.[12]
Products[edit]




An Enphase M190 mounted and grounded.


All Enphase microinverters are basically the same internally, with differences in the maximum amount of power they can handle and the cabling system being the major differences between models.
Legacy Products[edit]
The M175 was their first product, released in 2008. It was designed to output 175 Watts of AC power, but is capable of up to 5% over that. The M175 was packaged in a relatively large cast aluminum box, similar to the boxes used on cable tv amplifiers seen on telephone poles. Wiring was passed through the case using compression fittings and the inverters connected to each other using a twist-lock connection. A limited number of M210 models, based on the same generation system, were also available for a limited time.
Due to a high level of failures the M175 was recalled and replaced by the M190 in 2009. The M190 offers a slightly higher power rating of 190 Watts (peaking to 199). The system was packaged in a much smaller case, this time filled with epoxy potting material to handle heat dissipation, and built-in cable connections replacing the earlier compression fittings. The system was otherwise similar, using the same connectors and cabling as the M175, and the two designs could be mixed in a string. Like its predecessor the M175 the M190 has also been plagued by a high failure rate.
Around the same time the company also released the D380, which was essentially two M190's in a single larger case. For small inverters like the M190, the case and its assembly represents a significant portion of the total cost of production, so by placing two in a single box that cost is spread out. The D380 also introduced a new inter-inverter cabling system based on a "drop cable" system. This placed a single connector on a short cable on the inverter, and used a separate cable with either one or three connectors on it. Arrays were constructed by linking together up to three D380s with a single drop cable, and then connecting them to other drop cables using larger twist-fit connectors.
Current Products[edit]
In 2011 the entire lineup was replaced with the 3rd generation M215, combining the features of the M190 and D380. Like the M190, the M215 was a single inverter, now in a much smaller box. Like the D380, the M215 used a trunk cabling system with short connector cables on the inverters. However, instead of one or three-drop cable, the M215's Engage system, used a long roll of cables with connectors spliced into it. The installer cuts the Engage cable to the required length, and then caps the open ends that result.
In 2013 the M250 was released, offering a new grounding system that eliminates the otherwise NEC - required external grounding conductor, increased reliability, and increased efficiency (96.5%), along with a rating bump to 250W. Whereas previous models were all named after the maximum power rating, the M250 actually refers to its peak power. Using the same convention the M190 would be called the M199. The M250 is otherwise identical to the earlier M215 and compatible with the same Engage cabling system.
All Enphase models use power line communications to pass monitoring data between the inverters and the Envoy communications gateway. The Envoy stores daily performance data for up to a year, and, when available, allows Enphase's Enlighten web service to download data approximately every 15 minutes. Customers and installers can review the data on the Enlighten web site.
In 2015 the company launched its fifth generation of products. The S230 and S280 microinverters have the highest efficiency for module-level power electronics at 97%, offer advanced grid functionality like reactive power control, and comply with regulatory requirements like Electric Rule 21 in California and Rule 14H in Hawaii. The next-gen Envoy-S offers revenue-grade metering of solar production, consumption monitoring, and integrated Wi-Fi. The company also moved into home energy storage with its Storage System featuring an AC Battery, a modular, 1.2kWh lithium-iron phosphate offering aimed at residential users that is part of a Home Energy Solution. The Home Energy Solution will launch in Australia in mid-2016.
References[edit]



^ Enphase Energy
^ Eric Wesoff, "Enphase Dominates the PV Microinverter Channel: Where’s the Competition?", Greentech Media, 17 July 2013
^ Kerry Dolan, "Enphase's Rooftop Solar Revolution", Forbes, 21 October 2010
^ "Enphase Energy surpasses 500,000 solar PV inverter units shipped"
^ "Journey to the 1,000,000th Microinverter"
^ "Enphase Energy Launches 215-Series Microinverter", BusinessWire, 6 June 2011
^ Eric Wesoff, "Enphase S-1 Update: PV Microinverter Sales Soar", Greentech Media, 25 February 2012
^ "Solar Microinverter Shipments to Quadruple and Reach 2.1 Gigawatts in 2017", IHS Electronics and Media, 27 August 2013
^ "PV Inverter Supplier Base Fragments in 2012", IHS Electronics and Media, 2 May 2013
^ Jeff St. John, "Microinverter Wars: Enecsys and Enphase Go Trans-Atlantic", Greentech Media, 6 December 2011
^ Loralee Stevens, "Enphase Energy continues momentum", North Bay Business Journal, 2 September 2013
^ Tildy Bayar,"Solar Photovoltaic Inverter Prices to Fall Due to Fierce Global Competition", REWorld, 1 August 2013



External links[edit]

Enphase - LCF-250-PC Line Filter, manufactured by RadiusPower.com





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Enphase_Energy&oldid=770181124"					
Categories: Photovoltaics manufacturersCompanies listed on NASDAQSolar energy companies of the United StatesSolar energy in CaliforniaManufacturing companies based in CaliforniaTechnology companies based in the San Francisco Bay AreaEnergy companies established in 20062006 establishments in CaliforniaAmerican companies established in 2006Renewable resource companies established in 2006Companies based in Sonoma County, CaliforniaPetaluma, CaliforniaEnergy in the San Francisco Bay AreaHidden categories: Articles with a promotional tone from August 2016All articles with a promotional toneArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2012All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2013 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 13 March 2017, at 22:12.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








Enphase Energy, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































August 03, 2017 12:48 PM ET
Electrical Equipment

Company Overview of Enphase Energy, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Enphase Energy, Inc., together with its subsidiaries, designs, develops, and sells microinverter systems for residential and commercial markets in the United States and internationally. The company’s semiconductor-based microinverter system converts direct current electricity to alternating current (AC) electricity at the individual solar module level. It also offers energy storage systems, including its AC battery; and energy monitoring and control services. The company sells its microinverter systems primarily to distributors, as well as directly to large installers through original equipment manufacturers and strategic partners. Enphase Energy, Inc. was founded in 2006 and is headquartere...
Enphase Energy, Inc., together with its subsidiaries, designs, develops, and sells microinverter systems for residential and commercial markets in the United States and internationally. The company’s semiconductor-based microinverter system converts direct current electricity to alternating current (AC) electricity at the individual solar module level. It also offers energy storage systems, including its AC battery; and energy monitoring and control services. The company sells its microinverter systems primarily to distributors, as well as directly to large installers through original equipment manufacturers and strategic partners. Enphase Energy, Inc. was founded in 2006 and is headquartered in Petaluma, California.
Detailed Description


1420 North McDowell BoulevardPetaluma, CA 94954United StatesFounded in 2006430 Employees



Phone: 707-774-7000

www.enphase.com







Key Executives for Enphase Energy, Inc.




Mr. Paul B. Nahi


      	Chief Executive Officer, President and Director
      


Age: 54
        

Total Annual Compensation: $525.0K








Mr. Humberto Garcia


      	Chief Financial Officer, Principal Accounting Officer and Vice President
      


Age: 52
        

Total Annual Compensation: $324.4K





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2016. 

Enphase Energy, Inc. Key Developments

LG Electronics USA, Inc. Releases Two-Step Solar Panel with Enphase Energy, Inc
Jul 11 17
LG Electronics USA announced the NeON® 2 ACe in collaboration with Enphase Energy Inc. at Intersolar 2017. The alliance between LG Electronics USA and Enphase Energy, forged last year, is aimed at making solar solutions an easier investment. The LG NeON 2 ACe is the first result of the collaboration for residential installation, and it reduces installation time by half, compared with conventional modules, while offering cutting-edge technology. The result of two solar industry pacesetters, LG NeON 2 ACe brings together high-performance and a simplified user experience, combining the processes of logistics, installation and monitoring. Installation, always a concern for homeowners, becomes a quick, two-step roof installation process with this integrated AC Module - lifting the microinverter out of the flat shipping positon and connecting the cable without the need to install the two products separately. Once roof installation is complete and Enphase's internal software is set up, Enphase technology remote monitoring and management software can be controlled from any web connected device. On the surface, LG NeON 2 ACe utilizes brand new cello technology, which replaces the industry standard three busbars with 30 thin wires, enhancing output and reliability. This technology allows for more energy-efficiency and premium temperature performance characteristics. Aesthetically, these innovations are designed to improve curb-appeal for the homeowner, creating a sleek, black look. The energy created by this elegant solar panel can be safely converted to AC voltage, another product of this revolutionary partnership. A strategically positioned 15mm distance separates the DC module and the microinverter, mitigating any impact to performance and reliability by allowing sufficient air-flow for cooling. LG NeON 2 ACe also comes equip with LG Electronics' robust 12-year unit warranty and a 25-year warranty for the microinverter. LG Electronics is committed to exceeding customer's values and expectations beyond efficiency. The anodized aluminum frame of the panel can endure a front load up to 6,000Pa and a rear load up to 5,400Pa. This product is built to last.


Enphase Energy Receives Non-Compliance Notice From The Nasdaq
Jun 28 17
On June 23, 2017, Enphase Energy, Inc. was notified by the Nasdaq Stock Market LLC (“Nasdaq”) that for the previous 30 consecutive business days the bid price for the Company’s common stock had closed below the minimum $1.00 per share requirement for continued listing under Nasdaq Listing Rule 5450(a)(1).  That notification of noncompliance has no immediate effect on the listing or trading of the Company's common stock on the Nasdaq Global Market. Under Nasdaq Listing Rule 5810(c)(3)(A), if the minimum bid price of the Company’s common stock meets or exceeds $1.00 per share for a minimum of ten consecutive business days during the 180-day period following June 23, 2017, Nasdaq will provide the Company with written confirmation of compliance with the Minimum Bid Price Requirement and this matter will be closed. If the Company does not achieve compliance with the Minimum Bid Price Requirement by December 20, 2017, the Company may be eligible for an additional 180-calendar-day compliance period if it elects to transfer to the Nasdaq Capital Market. To qualify, the Company would be required to meet the continued listing requirement for market value of publicly held shares and all other initial listing standards for the Nasdaq Capital Market, with the exception of the Minimum Bid Price Requirement, and would need to provide written notice of its intention to cure the deficiency during the second compliance period. However, if it appears to Nasdaq that the Company will not be able to cure the deficiency, or if the Company is otherwise not eligible, Nasdaq would notify the Company that its securities would be subject to delisting. In the event of such notification, the Company may appeal Nasdaq’s determination to delist its securities, but there can be no assurance Nasdaq would grant the Company’s request for continued listing. The Company intends to monitor the closing bid price of its common stock and will consider available options to regain compliance with the Minimum Bid Price Requirement, including a reverse stock split.


Enphase Energy, Inc. - Analyst/Investor Day
Jun 7 17
Enphase Energy, Inc. - Analyst/Investor Day


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 10C Technologies, Inc. United States 24M Technologies, Inc. United States 2D2C, Inc. United States 360 Electrical, LLC United States 4D Energetics Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Private Placement

			      January 9, 2017
			    
--





Request Profile Update


				\
	














 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Enphase Energy, Inc., please visit www.enphase.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close































    Enphase Energy, Inc. | Enphase® M250 | Solar Inverter Datasheet | ENF Inverter Directory

 





















 










        "Our adverts are very targeted (inverter manufacturer advert on inverter category etc.) – how about disabling your ad blocker on ENF?"
    





ENF Solar

Accelerating the Industry
 Language:English中文日本語한국어العربيةFrançaisEspañolDeutschItaliano












                    Solar Inverter Directory


                Enphase® M250
            















                        Enphase® M250
                    

                        Enphase Energy, Inc.
                    







                    Type:
                

                    On-Grid, Micro-inverter
                



                    Power Range:
                

                    0.25 kW
                



                    Region:
                

                    United States
                    








        Enquire
    



Note: Your Enquiry will be sent directly to Enphase Energy, Inc..
                    




                            Alternative Product
                    
 







                    FSA
                

                    YangZhou Flourish Sunshine Energy
                






Overview


DC Input


AC Output







                            Type:
                    

            Off-Grid
        



                            Product Warranty:
                    

            --
        



                            Protection Class:
                    

            IP20 
        



                            Dimension:
                    

            295x180x305 mm
        



                            Weight:
                    

            9 kg
        







                            Max. DC Power:
                    

            --
        



                            Max. DC Voltage:
                    

            --
        



                            Max. DC Current:
                    

            --
        



                            MPP(T) Voltage Range:
                    

            --
        



                            No of MPP Trackers:
                    

            --
        







                            ﻿Max. AC Power:
                    

            0.5 kW
        



                            Frequency:
                    

            50,60 Hz
        



                            Max. Efficiency:
                    

            85 %
        



                            Euro Efficiency:
                    

            --
        



                            Feed-in Phases:
                    

            --
        







            More
        










                        Product Info
                    




                        Company Profile
                    






Product Characteristics




                Model No.
                
                
                            






                                                                                             M250-60-2LL-S22, S25 
                                                                                    








            Warranty 
        

            
        



                Product Warranty (Min)
                
                
                            






                                                                                             25 Years
                                                                                    








            Input Data(DC) 
        

            
        



                Max. DC Power
                
                
                            






                                                                                             0.3 kW
                                                                                    








                Max. DC Voltage
                
                
                            






                                                                                             48 V
                                                                                    








                Min. DC Voltage to Start Feed In
                
                
                            






                                                                                             22 V
                                                                                    








                Max. DC Current
                
                
                            






                                                                                             9.8 A
                                                                                    








            Output Data (AC) 
        

            
        



                ﻿Max. AC Power
                
                
                            






                                                                                             0.25 kW
                                                                                    








                Nominal AC Power
                
                
                            






                                                                                             0.24 kW
                                                                                    








                Output  AC Voltage Range
                
                
                            






                                                                                             183~264 V
                                                                                    








                Nominal AC Voltage
                
                
                            






                                                                                             208, 240 V
                                                                                    








                Frequency Range
                
                
                            






                                                                                             57-62.5 Hz
                                                                                    








                Frequency
                
                
                            






                                                                                             60 Hz
                                                                                    








                Power Factor (cosθ)
                
                
                            






                                                                                             0.95 
                                                                                    








                Max. Efficiency
                
                
                            






                                                                                             96.5 %
                                                                                    








            General Data 
        

            
        



                Dimensions (H/W/D) 
                
                
                            






                                                                                             173x171x30 mm
                                                                                    








                Weight
                
                
                            






                                                                                             1.6 kg
                                                                                    








                Power Consumption at Night
                
                
                            






                                                                                             < 0.065 W
                                                                                    








                Operating Temperature
                 
                                
            

                                    -40 ~ +85 ℃
                            



                Protection Class
                 
                                
            

                                    NEMA 6 
                            



                Cooling
                 
                                
            

                                    Natural 
                            



                Certifications
                
                









                                                            UL 1741
                                                        

                                                            (UL)
                                                                                                                    

                                                                E341165
                                                                                                                                    











                Download Manufacturer's PDF
                 
                                
            





















                                    Enphase Energy, Inc.
                                






                                            1420 N. McDowell Blvd, Petaluma, CA 94954
                                        







                                                https://enphase.com
                                            





        Enquire
    

                                Send message to this supplier
                            







                            4 More Series From Enphase Energy, Inc.
                        









                Enphase S230
            

                0.23 kW
            
Micro-inverter 






                Enphase S280
            

                0.28 kW
            
Micro-inverter 






                Enphase® C250
            

                0.25 kW
            
Micro-inverter 






                Enphase® M215
            

                0.225 kW
            
Micro-inverter 


















Stefan Zschiegner - Vice President of Product Management at Enphase Energy, Inc.
































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              





























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Stefan Zschiegner
Vice President of Product Management at Enphase Energy, Inc.



Overview
In The News Relationships Paths
Education Career History 


Stefan Zschiegner
Vice President of Product Management at Enphase Energy, Inc.



 Overview



Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 2,070 people.
              






 In The News
          See more




PR Newswire
March 21, 2017





                        Temasys WebRTC Plugin Deployed by ShoreTel for Browser-Based Calling                    





Business Wire
December 3, 2015





                        Next-Generation AC Solar Modules Integrate LG High-Efficiency Panels with Enphase Advanced Microinverter Technology                    





Greentech Media
November 18, 2015





                        Enphase Aims to Reduce Microinverter Cost by 50% in Two Years                    





Marketline Newswire
September 23, 2015





                        Enphase Energy selects AT&T for IoT connectivity                    





Business Wire
September 14, 2015





                        SolarWorld Joins Forces with Enphase to Develop Integrated AC Modules                    







See full news coverage and complete stories with RelSci Professional.

Create Your News Feed








See  More 






 Relationships
              See Details




Stephan Hansen

Chief Operating Officer & Director at Juwi AG




John Bender

Former Executive Director & Vice President at HP, Inc.





Raghuveer R. Belur

Co-Founder at Enphase Energy, Inc.




Paul B. Nahi

President & Chief Executive Officer at Enphase Energy, Inc.





Badrinarayanan Kothandaraman

Chief Operating Officer at Enphase Energy, Inc.




Peter van Berkel

General Manager-Europe, the Middle East & Africa at Enphase Energy, Inc.





Humbert Garcia

Chief Financial Officer & Vice President at Enphase Energy, Inc.




Mike Lewis

Vice President & General Manager, US & Canada Sales at Enphase Energy, Inc.





Mel Parker

Senior Vice President & General Manager for Residential & Commercial Energy Solutions at Enphase Energy, Inc.




Christian Zdebel

Head-Media Relations at Enphase Energy, Inc.







See 2,060 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 2,060 More 


 


 Paths to Stefan Zschiegner



            Stefan Zschiegner          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Stefan Zschiegner






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Stefan Zschiegner.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Educational Background



 


Technische Universität Hamburg-Harburg







 Career History



Vice President of Product Management

                                    Tenure Unconfirmed                


Enphase Energy, Inc.


                  Only Enphase Energy brings a system-based, high-tech approach to solar energy, leveraging expertise in semiconductor integration, power electronics and networking technologies to continually advance the performance, intelligence and reliability of solar energy systems.
Vision
Enphase's vision is to make solar simple and energy smart so everyone is empowered to create a zero energy footprint for themselves, their home and their business. Our mission is to build the world's finest networked energy system and revolutionize power generation on a global scale - one solar panel, one kilowatt hour at a time. By combining the power of solar energy and the proven advantages of communications technology, Enphase Energy products make solar power systems productive, reliable, smart and safe – increasing the energy harvest of solar panels by up to 25 percent. Enphase Energy, a publicly-held company based in Northern California, is led by veterans from the solar, telecom, networking and software industries, and backed by leaders from throughout the solar power industry.
Our Technology
Only Enphase Energy brings a system-based, high-tech approach to solar energy, leveraging expertise in semiconductor integration, power electronics and networking technologies to continually advance the performance, intelligence and reliability of solar energy systems. The Enphase System includes our revolutionary microinverter, groundbreaking data collection and transmission equipment, and powerful web-based analytics and management tools. Read more about our Our Technology.
Our Partners
Enphase Energy partners include solar equipment distributors who understand and embrace the dramatic improvements that Enphase Microinverter Systems bring to solar power installations, and have invested their resources to promote this breakthrough solution for solar power conversion                




Vice President of Marketing & Product Development

                                    2012 - Prior                


Nanosolar, Inc.


                  Nanosolar, Inc. designs, engineers and manufactures thin film solar cells and panels. It utilizes Print2Power platform that enables higher conversion efficiency and superior thermal stability. The firm offers through its locations in Germany, Switzerland & the United States. The company was founded in May 2002 by Martin R. Roscheisen and Brian Sager and is headquartered in San Jose, CA.                




Head-Marketing Management & Applications

                                    Prior                


HP, Inc.


                  HP Inc. provides personal computing and other access devices, imaging and printing products, and related technologies, solutions and services to individual consumers, small and medium-sized businesses and large enterprises, including customers in the government, health and education sectors. It operates through following business segments: Personal Systems, Printing, and Corporate Investments. The Personal Systems segment offers Commercial personal computers, Consumer PCs, Workstations, thin clients, Commercial tablets and mobility devices, retail point-of-sale systems, displays and other related accessories, support, and services for the commercial and consumer markets. The Printing segment provides consumer and commercial printer hardware, supplies, media, solutions and services, as well as scanning devices. The Corporate Investments segment includes HP Labs and certain business incubation projects. The company was founded by William R. Hewlett and David Packard in January 1939 and is headquartered in Palo Alto, CA.                




Senior Vice President-Marketing

                                    Prior                


Raydiance, Inc.


                  Raydiance, Inc. develops, manufactures and markets precision manufacturing solutions enabled by femtosecond laser technology. It offers femtosecond lasers and beam modules, Raydiance software and support and manufacturing lines. The company serves the consumer electronics, medical device, automotive technology and industrial applications. The company was founded by Jeff Bullington, Peter J. Delfyett, Scott H. Davison, Joel W. McCleary and Barry Martin Schuler in 2003 and is headquartered in Petaluma, CA.                




Vice President-Global Product Management & Applications

                                    Prior                


First Solar, Inc.


                  Founded in 1999, First Solar has become the world’s premier provider of fully integrated solar solutions, creating value-driven renewable energy projects that represent the leading edge of utility-scale solar technology and innovation.

Having constructed and commissioned many of the world’s largest, state-of-the-art photovoltaic (PV) power plants in operation today, First Solar has established a portfolio of customers that include some of the world’s most sophisticated energy buyers.

Our full service approach ensures the successful delivery of clean, affordable solar power—and spans the entire value chain, including module manufacturing; project development; engineering, procurement, and construction (EPC); financing; and operations and maintenance (O&M).                




Professional

                                    Prior                


Agilent Technologies, Inc.


                  Agilent Technologies, Inc. engages in the provision of core bio-analytical and electronic measurement solutions to the life sciences, chemical analysis, communications and electronics, diagnostics and genomics industries. It operates through the following segments: Life Sciences; Chemical Analysis; Diagnostics and Genomics; and Electronic Measurement. The Life Sciences segment provides application-focused solutions that include instruments, software, consumables and services that enable customers to identify, quantify and analyze the physical and biological properties of substances and products. The Chemical Analysis segment manufactures gas chromatography mass spectrometry systems, inductively coupled plasma mass spectrometry instruments, atomic absorption instruments, inductively coupled plasma optical emission spectrometry instruments, molecular spectroscopy instruments, vacuum pumps and measurement technologies supports and services. The Diagnostics and Genomics segment provides solutions that include reagents, instruments, software and consumables that enable customers in the clinical and life sciences research areas to interrogate samples at the molecular level. The Electronic Measurement segment provides electronic measurement instruments and systems, software design tools and related services that are used in the design, development, manufacture, installation, deployment and operation of electronics equipment and microscopy products. The company was founded in 1999 and is headquartered in Santa Clara, CA.                





 Other Affiliations




              Stefan Zschiegner is affiliated with
                            Enphase Energy, Inc., Nanosolar, Inc., HP, Inc., Raydiance, Inc., First Solar, Inc., Agilent Technologies, Inc..
            




You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤















Enphase Energy - Profile & Reviews 2017 | EnergySage





































About Solar



Learn About Solar
Solar FAQs
Solar News Feed
Solar Reviews
Solar Q&A Forum
Solar Gallery
Solar Case Studies
Community Solar
Search





Solar Calculator




Solar Loans




Join Solar Marketplcae











  888.838.4638





About Solar





Learn About Solar
Solar FAQs
Solar News Feed
Solar Reviews
Solar Q&A Forum
Solar Gallery
Solar Case Studies
Community Solar
Search





Solar Calculator


Solar Loans










x


Sign In


Join Solar Marketplace















Enphase Energy - Profile & Reviews









































(3)


















Get a Free Quote






Primary Lines of Business





Product Manufacturer



Solar O&M Provider














Enphase Energy - Profile & Reviews



Get a Free Quote







Primary Lines of Business





Product Manufacturer



Solar O&M Provider











































(3)











About Enphase Energy




Established
2006


Areas of Service

                            
                                AL, 
                            
                                AK, 
                            
                                AZ, 
                            
                                AR, 
                            
                                CA, 
                            
                                CO, 
                            
                                CT, 
                            
                                DE, 
                            
                                DC, 
                            
                                FL, 
                            
                                GA, 
                            
                                HI, 
                            
                                ID, 
                            
                                IL, 
                            
                                IN, 
                            
                                IA, 
                            
                                KS, 
                            
                                KY, 
                            
                                LA, 
                            
                                ME, 
                            
                                MD, 
                            
                                MA, 
                            
                                MI, 
                            
                                MN, 
                            
                                MS, 
                            
                                MO, 
                            
                                MT, 
                            
                                NE, 
                            
                                NV, 
                            
                                NH, 
                            
                                NJ, 
                            
                                NM, 
                            
                                NY, 
                            
                                NC, 
                            
                                ND, 
                            
                                OH, 
                            
                                OK, 
                            
                                OR, 
                            
                                PA, 
                            
                                RI, 
                            
                                SC, 
                            
                                SD, 
                            
                                TN, 
                            
                                TX, 
                            
                                UT, 
                            
                                VT, 
                            
                                VA, 
                            
                                WA, 
                            
                                WV, 
                            
                                WI, 
                            
                                WY
                            
                        


Headquarters





                                1420 N McDowell Blvd
Petaluma, CA
94954 United States




Workmanship Warranty
North America -- 25 years
Europe -- 20 years
United Kingdom -- 20 years
Australia and New Zealand 10 years


Certifications
ISO 9001:2008 for Quality Management Standards 
ISO 14001:2009 for Environmental Management Standards







Additional Services Offered




Additional Services Offered








                                    Manufacturing
                                






                                    Solar Repair & Maintenance
                                







Why Work With Us




Why Work With Us

CLEAN ENERGY THAT EMPOWERSAdvanced solar and storage technology from Enphase empowers you with green energy that not only saves you money, it gives you peace of mind. Make the smartest, safest choice for your family and your home.
SMART SAVINGSThe Enphase Home Energy Solution combines solar, storage and sophisticated software. It’s a truly integrated system that delivers savings by making the most of the energy you produce. It works for you, while you’re busy living your life.
SMART INVESTMENTWe put quality and reliability first, at every stage of our business. The result is products you can count on, for years to come and in any climate.
SMART FUTUREEnphase products are not only ready for tomorrow’s smart grid; they’re powered by software that updates remotely. That means your system stays on the leading-edge: today, tomorrow or years from now. Secure a smarter future—for you and for the planet.





More About Us




More About Us

ENPHASE // CLEAN ENERGY FOR EVERYONEWith our strong commitment to a clean energy future, Enphase Energy has become a world leader by delivering smart, easy-to-use technology that connects energy generation, storage and management on one intelligent platform. We revolutionized solar with our microinverters and now produce the world’s only truly integrated solar-plus-storage solution.




Technology Offered




Technology Offered








                                    Solar PV
                                






                                    Energy Storage
                                







Brochure & Media Gallery




Brochure & Media Gallery

(3 of 6)

Show All




(3 of 6)

Show All







Enphase Home Energy Solution - How It Works









All-AC, low voltage power for safer solar











Dedicated to Quality









Enphase Enlighten lets you monitor your solar from anywhere











Enphase M250 Microinverter











Enphase Storage System














Industry Affiliations












Associated Suppliers




Associated Suppliers



Financing Companies
Sunrun
Admirals bank
NRG Clean Power
Mosaic
Sunnova Energy Corporation
OneRoof Energy
LightStream
Matadors Community Credit Union
Redwood Credit Union
Dividend Solar
Clean Energy Finance and Investment Authority
Sungage Financial
Spruce Finance
Sunlender
Hudson Clean Energy


Installers
Over 3,000 active installers nationwide






Product Manufacturing Details




Product Manufacturing Details



Current Models And Output
B280-1200-LL-I-US00-RF0 


Product Technology
LFP






Case Studies




Case Studies




S-Tile Roof Installation






2,640
annual savings




S-Tile Roof Installation

Single-Family ResidenceSolar PV




Composite Shingle Roof






3,000
annual savings




Composite Shingle Roof

Single-Family ResidenceSolar PV




Solar Ground Mount at Luxury Estate






13,176
annual savings




Solar Ground Mount at Luxury Estate

Single-Family ResidenceSolar PV




AJ Alhait








AJ Alhait

ResidentialSolar PV




Solar PV on existing house






1,600
annual savings




Solar PV on existing house

Single-Family ResidenceSolar PV




Customer experiance 






4,920
annual savings




Customer experiance 

ResidentialSolar PV




Solar PV on existing house








Solar PV on existing house

Solar PV




Dedham, MA Solar PV in Greenlodge






1,575
annual savings




Dedham, MA Solar PV in Greenlodge

ResidentialSolar PV




Fota Solar






2,800
annual savings




Fota Solar

Single-Family ResidenceSolar PV




15 4th St. SE






955
annual savings




15 4th St. SE

ResidentialSolar PV




Shadow Hills Battery Backup






2,470
annual savings




Shadow Hills Battery Backup

ResidentialEnergy Storage




Solar PV and electric car charger in Virgnia








Solar PV and electric car charger in Virgnia

Multi-Family ResidenceSolar PV




Wise Home






1,800
annual savings




Wise Home

ResidentialSolar PV




Adams Solar






800
annual savings




Adams Solar

ResidentialSolar PV




Dr. Olmstead 's Solar Installation








Dr. Olmstead 's Solar Installation

Single-Family ResidenceSolar PV




Lyme CT








Lyme CT

ResidentialSolar PV




Cumberland Solar PV






3,845
annual savings




Cumberland Solar PV

ResidentialSolar PV




Solar PV Electric power 0 Energy home 






8,700
annual savings




Solar PV Electric power 0 Energy home 

ResidentialSolar PV




Lakeway TX






500
annual savings




Lakeway TX

ResidentialSolar PV




Brian Vaughn - Barrington RI






1,000
annual savings




Brian Vaughn - Barrington RI

ResidentialSolar PV



Show All






Reviews from Our Community





Reviews from Our Community



































3 Reviews

Write a Review









cmwhitman



"Great products"





































Reviewed Jul 02, 2017
                    
                

"Great products"

Very happy with my solar system and haven't had any issues.  Highly recommend this product for anyone looking for solar. Read Less
Very happy with my solar system and haven't had any issues.  Highly recommend this product for anyone looking for solar. 





0 out of
            0 people found this review helpful
        



        Was this review helpful?  YES  |  NO




















pn559



"Enphase m215 powering my Sun Edison Panels installed by Infinity Energy In C.A."





































Reviewed Jun 18, 2016
                    
                

"Enphase m215 powering my Sun Edison Panels installed by Infinity Energy In C.A."

They're awesome, I've been installed for 6 months and no problems. Plus online monitoring is So Cool!!! Online access to watch daily production and you get a monthly email that shows your production with carbon offset. Great product and Very Satisfied!!!
Paul (Fresno, CA Area) Read Less
They're awesome, I've been installed for 6 months and no problems. Plus online monitoring is So Cool!!! Online access to watch daily production and you get a monthly email that shows your production with carbon offset. Great product and Very Satisfied!!!
Paul (Fresno, CA Area) 





2 out of
            2 people found this review helpful
        



        Was this review helpful?  YES  |  NO




















AWHenricks



"Using this company to monitor my panels"





































Reviewed Feb 03, 2016
                    
                

"Using this company to monitor my panels"

No issues so far... 1 month on-line.
Gui could be better and updating "System" was difficult.
Not bad and functional.
Did contact them about a minor issue... They responded.
 Read Less
No issues so far... 1 month on-line.
Gui could be better and updating "System" was difficult.
Not bad and functional.
Did contact them about a minor issue... They responded.
 





2 out of
            2 people found this review helpful
        



        Was this review helpful?  YES  |  NO


















 

Find out how much solar can SAVE you!


Get customized solar estimates for your home or business
Calculate Solar Savings




















See solar quotes near you
Enter your zip code to see solar quotes near you


Enter your zip code











EnergySage

How It Works
About Us
Press
Careers



Go Solar

Solar Marketplace
Solar Calculator
Learn About Solar
Solar News



Work With Us

Solar Companies
Partnerships & Programs
Market Research







Connect with us








All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2009 - 2017

Terms of Use
Updated 10/16

  •  

Privacy Policy
Updated 09/16






All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2009 - 2017

Terms of Use
Updated 10/16

  •  

Privacy Policy
Updated 09/16




































 







Company Overview | Enphase Energy





































 







 Hide Search

Search Enphase

Search Submit

 Show search



Explore Enphase














Close











Toggle dropdowns on mobile
Support




Overview


Solar Professionals 


System Owners


Training 


Module Compatibility 


Contact Support








Toggle dropdowns on mobile
Company




Overview


Energy Evolved


Leadership


Newsroom


Careers


Investors 


Blog


Contact Us







Enlighten Login


Search



 




United States
/
Change Country




Hide Search















{{link.title}}





















					About Us											We make solar simple and energy smart.











      



	151
    




	issued patents




      



	14




	+
    




	million inverters shipped




      



	400




	+
    




	employees worldwide




      



	21
    




	countries of operation 









Our story
From start-up to global energy technology innovator.And it’s just the beginning. 







March 2006
Raghu Belur and Martin Fornage founded Enphase in California.













June 2008
We introduced the world’s first microinverter system.













September 2011
We hit a major milestone: one million microinverters shipped.













December 2011
Enphase went global in France and Italy. Other countries followed soon after.













March 2012
We made our NASDAQ debut under the symbol ENPH.













July 2013 
We introduced our fourth-generation technology, the M250 microinverter.  













October 2015
We unveiled our Home Energy Solution, the world’s first truly integrated energy system.













November 2015
We shipped our 10 millionth microinverter.













December 2015
We announced the development of a new generation of AC solar modules in partnerships with SolarWorld and LG.













March 2016
We opened our new research & development facility in New Zealand.













August 2016
The first shipment of our AC Battery was delivered to customers in Australia and New Zealand.













September 2016
We announced our sixth-generation microinverter technology, the Enphase IQ Microinverter System.















March 2006
Raghu Belur and Martin Fornage founded Enphase in California.











September 2011
We hit a major milestone: one million microinverters shipped.











December 2011
Enphase went global in France and Italy. Other countries followed soon after.











June 2008
We introduced the world’s first microinverter system.












March 2012
We made our NASDAQ debut under the symbol ENPH.











October 2015
We unveiled our Home Energy Solution, the world’s first truly integrated energy system.











November 2015
We shipped our 10 millionth microinverter.











July 2013 
We introduced our fourth-generation technology, the M250 microinverter.  












December 2015
We announced the development of a new generation of AC solar modules in partnerships with SolarWorld and LG.











August 2016
The first shipment of our AC Battery was delivered to customers in Australia and New Zealand.











September 2016
We announced our sixth-generation microinverter technology, the Enphase IQ Microinverter System.











March 2016
We opened our new research & development facility in New Zealand.








 
















	Innovation





	The status quo doesn’t cut it for us. We’re tireless in our pursuit of new and better ways to make solar energy smarter, simpler, and more affordable. 


            READ MORE 











	Quality





	Quality is at the core of everything we do. That’s why our microinverters set an industry record for product testing: an unprecedented 1 million hours before launch. 


            READ MORE 











	Responsibility





	We never lose sight of the bigger picture: our commitment to preserving our planet’s resources and supporting our communities, local and global.


            READ MORE 














Careers 






Newsroom 






Investors 






    Contact us 

















{{videoTitle}} 













Choose your region and country




North America


Latin America & the Caribbean


Europe


Asia Pacific





United States


English





Canada


English







Colombia


Español





Chile


Español





Jamaica


English





Mexico


Español





Panama


Español





Puerto Rico


Español







Austria


Deutsch





Belgium


Français


Nederlands





Germany


Deutsch





France


Français





Italy


Italiano





Luxembourg


Français





Netherlands


Nederlands





Switzerland


Français


Deutsch





United Kingdom


English







Australia


English





India


English





New Zealand


English































Enphase Solar Products - Magitek Energy Solutions Inc.





























































FacebookCall Now! (847) 409-1927 


 








Featured Product Enphase




Enphase ENERGY makes microinverters that are at the forefront of solar energy capture technology

They are widely regarded as ‘the only solution’ in rooftop power conversion. The Enphase ENERGY system is the next generation technology that replaces the old one-central-inverter system. The new Enphase ENERGY microinverters can increase efficiencies to 95%. A microinverter converts direct current (DC) from solar modules to alternating current (AC) that we use in our homes.
Enphase Envoy:
The Enphase Microinverter continuously monitors the performance of the photovoltaics module they work with and communicate this information to the Enphase Envoy communications gateway. This data is collected and transmitted to the Enphase Enlighten Web site for monitoring and analysis.
Enphase M250 Microinverter:
The next stage in microinverter quality, the Enphase M250 Microinverter does everything the M190 and M215 Microinverters do but it also islates DC circuit and insulates from the ground so that a Ground Electrode Conducter is not required. Its simplicity of installation helps to cut down labor and material costs. A 4th-generation product, it is optimized for use with higher-power modules, has more than 1-million hours of testing and an industry leading warranty up to 25 years.
Enphase Energy Certificate of Compliance:
Enphase Energy products come with the UL Certificate of Compliance, in the U.S. and Canada, for general use power supplies.


Enphase Envoy Data sheet (PDF)
Enphase Envoy Data sheet
Enphase M190 Data sheet (PDF)
Enphase M190 Data sheet
Enphase M215 Data sheet (PDF)
Enphase M215 Data sheet
Enphase M250 Data sheet (PDF)
Enphase M250 Data sheet
Enphase M215 CSA Certificate (PDF)
Enphase M215 CSA Certificate
M250 Warranty NA (PDF)
M250 Warranty NA
Engage Cable CSA Certificate (PDF)
Engage Cable CSA Certificate
M215 Warranty
M215 Warranty

   

 

 
 

Explore 
About Us
Blog
FAQ
Free Consultation
HOME
Installations
Products

Enphase
IronRidge
SolarEdge
Solarworld





















Scroll to top



 







Enphase Energy: Smart Solar & Clean Energy For Everyone





































 







 Hide Search

Search Enphase

Search Submit

 Show search



Explore Enphase














Close











Toggle dropdowns on mobile
Support




Overview


Solar Professionals 


System Owners


Training 


Module Compatibility 


Contact Support








Toggle dropdowns on mobile
Company




Overview


Energy Evolved


Leadership


Newsroom


Careers


Investors 


Blog


Contact Us







Enlighten Login


Search



 




United States
/
Change Country




Hide Search















{{link.title}}





















					Meet the Enphase AC Module				

						Smart solar just got even smarter.					
Learn more
















					Introducing the Enphase IQ System				

						Next-level intelligence, easier than ever.					
Learn more
















					Your solar home is waiting.				

						See why Enphase belongs on your roof.					
Get started
















					Easier installs, satisfied customers.				

						Our residential solution transforms the way installers work.					
Learn more













620,000 +

Installations

                Find Enphase locations on the map 











{{stat.value}}



                {{stat.link.text.choppedString}} {{stat.link.text.lastWord}}
















Play Video













	Cut your installation time in half





	Our new AC Module cuts installation time in half compared to String+Optimizers.


See the difference 


















	Find an Enphase installer





	Did you know you can find local Enphase installers using our Enphase Installer Network? Get started today.


Find a solar installer 







Play Video













	Homeowner story – Jay and Swati





	"You win because you’re saving money, you’re reducing your carbon footprint, and because you feel good about it."


Watch the Video 












What we're talking about at Enphase
Enphase Blog







IQ makes solar installations smarter



    When Enphase set out to develop the IQ System , the sixth-generation microinverter system, we accepted a challenge to not only streamline the product for better...  

Read More






Enphase Storage System Is Available to US Installers



    Want to bring all the benefits of energy storage to your customers? Then we have some great news. The Enphase Storage System is now available from Enphase Authorized Distributors throughout the US.  

Read More











Upcoming events for solar professionals
see all events




    Aug 03


	  Training - Webinar  


    Webinar - Introduction to AC Module Installation (Aug 3)  


view event




    Aug 09


	  Training - Webinar  


    Webinar - How to Design and Plan for Enphase Storage  


view event




    Aug 10


	  Training - Webinar  


    Webinar - Guide to Successful CT Installation  


view event




    Aug 15


	  Training - Webinar  


    Webinar - Introduction to AC Module Installation (Aug 15)  


view event











We're proud to be recognized









Green Builder Hot 50 Products, 2017









UL 9540 Certified Home Energy Storage System, 2016









20 Most Innovative Companies,2015









#1 Residential PV Monitoring,  2015









Best Places to WorkBay Area,2015









TechnologyPioneer,2013


 
















{{videoTitle}} 













Choose your region and country




North America


Latin America & the Caribbean


Europe


Asia Pacific





United States


English





Canada


English







Colombia


Español





Chile


Español





Jamaica


English





Mexico


Español





Panama


Español





Puerto Rico


Español







Austria


Deutsch





Belgium


Français


Nederlands





Germany


Deutsch





France


Français





Italy


Italiano





Luxembourg


Français





Netherlands


Nederlands





Switzerland


Français


Deutsch





United Kingdom


English







Australia


English





India


English





New Zealand


English






































Enphase Energy Inc in Milpitas, CA
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Enphase Energy  Inc, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Enphase Energy  Inc

Enphase Energy Inc exports to Flextronics Global Service through the port of Los Angeles, California        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Enphase Energy  Inc and millions of other manufacturers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 BOEING SUPPORT SERVICES
 GENERAL ELECTRIC CAPITAL CORPORATIO
 PING INC.
 FRITO LAY DOMINICANA, S.A.         
 HOT TOPIC MERCHANDISE INC.
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Enphase Energy  Inc
Enphase Energy Inc exports to Flextronics Global Service through the port of Los Angeles, California


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



ENPHASE ENERGY INC
1420 N. MCDOWELL BLVD PETALUMA CA 94954 US


FLEXTRONICS GLOBAL SERVICE
890 YOSEMITE DR. MILPITAS CA 95035 US



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



-NOT AVAILABLE




NO MARKS
NO MARKS





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number



ANLCAEL0561752


TGHU9489142
TGHU9489142


Product Description




TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT
TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT









Bill of LadingEXDO6950032839Arrival Date2016-03-20Weight (LB)1,131Weight (KG)514UnitsCMQuantity2 PKGContainer Count1CBM5Voyage No.00466Port of LoadingSYDNEYPort of DischargeLOS ANGELES, CALIFORNIAVessel NameCAP CORRIENTESCarrier CodeEXDOCountry Of OriginAustraliaPlace Of ReceiptSYDNEY 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Enphase Energy  Inc. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Enphase Energy  Inc has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Enphase Energy  Inc







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Enphase Energy  Inc
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Winning Trading Importacao E                                



                                    Cogreens Llc                                



                                    Henan Cactus Import&export Trade                                



                                    Abastecedora De Cristales Vmglass                                



                                    Masscoco Lanka Pvt Ltd                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.5438
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X















